District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5719

Insurance and/or annuities upon lives of children; applications — Computation of contributions.

Repealed.

History

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 953, ch. 862, § 3
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(b), 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1219.
1973 Ed., § 35-919.